Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6531
Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for any year, defined.

Nebraska statewide average hourly wage for any year means the most recent statewide average hourly wage paid by all employers in all counties in Nebraska as calculated by the Office of Labor Market Information of the Department of Labor using annual data from the Quarterly Census of Employment and Wages by October 1 of the year prior to application. Hourly wages shall be calculated by dividing the reported average annual weekly wage by forty.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 8.
July 1, 2027